Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5001.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 27. (a)(1) When a determination, redetermination, or decision is made that benefits are due an unemployed individual, the benefits become payable from the fund and continue to be payable to the unemployed individual, subject to the limitations imposed by the individual's monetary entitlement, if the individual continues to be unemployed and to file claims for benefits, until the determination, redetermination, or decision is reversed or a determination, redetermination, or decision on a new issue holding the individual disqualified or ineligible is made. (2) Benefits are payable in person or by mail through employment security offices in accordance with rules promulgated by the unemployment insurance agency. (b)(1) Subject to subsection (f), for benefit years beginning on or after October 1, 2000, an individual's weekly benefit rate is 4.1% of the individual's wages paid in the calendar quarter of the base period in which the individual was paid the highest total wages, plus $6.00 for each dependent as defined in subdivision (4), except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, up to a maximum of 5 dependents, claimed by the individual at the time the individual files a new claim for benefits, except that the individual's maximum weekly benefit rate must not exceed $362.00 before January 1, 2025. The unemployment insurance agency shall establish the procedures necessary to verify the number of dependents claimed. An individual who fraudulently claims a dependent is subject to the penalties set forth in sections 54 and 54c. For benefit years beginning on or after October 2, 1983, the weekly benefit rate must be adjusted to the next lower multiple of $1.00. Beginning January 1, 2025, an individual's weekly benefit rate must be calculated in accordance with this subdivision using the following monetary amounts for each dependent, if any, and must not exceed the following maximum weekly benefit rates: (a) For a claim filed on or after January 1, 2025, $12.66 for each dependent, and the maximum weekly benefit rate must not exceed $446.00. (b) For a claim filed on or after January 1, 2026, $19.33 for each dependent, and the maximum weekly benefit rate must not exceed $530.00. (c) For a claim filed on or after January 1, 2027, $26.00 for each dependent, and the maximum weekly benefit rate must not exceed $614.00. (d) For a claim filed on or after January 1, 2028, the adjusted monetary amount established under subsection (r) for each dependent, and the maximum weekly benefit rate must not exceed the adjusted maximum weekly benefit rate established under subsection (r). (2) For benefit years beginning before October 1, 2000, the state average weekly wage for a calendar year is computed on the basis of the 12 months ending the June 30 immediately preceding that calendar year. (3) For benefit years beginning before October 1, 2000, a dependent means any of the following individuals who are receiving and for at least 90 consecutive days immediately before the week for which benefits are claimed, or, in the case of a dependent husband, wife, spouse or child, for the duration of the marital or parental relationship, if the relationship has existed less than 90 days, has received more than 1/2 the cost of his or her the spouse's or child's support from the individual claiming benefits: (a) A child, including stepchild, adopted child, or grandchild of the individual who is under 18 years of age, or 18 years of age or over if, because of physical or mental infirmity, the child is unable to engage in a gainful occupation, or is a full-time student as defined by the particular educational institution, at a high school, vocational school, community or junior college, or college or university and has not attained the age of 22. (b) The husband or wife spouse of the individual. (c) The legal father or mother parent of the individual if that parent is either more than 65 years of age or is permanently disabled from engaging in a gainful occupation. (d) A brother or sister sibling of the individual if the brother or sister sibling is orphaned or the living parents are dependent parents of an individual, and the brother or sister sibling is under 18 years of age, or 18 years of age or over if, because of physical or mental infirmity, the brother or sister sibling is unable to engage in a gainful occupation, or is a full-time student as defined by the particular educational institution, at a high school, vocational school, community or junior college, or college or university and is less than 22 years of age. (4) For benefit years beginning on or after October 1, 2000, a dependent means any of the following individuals who received for at least 90 consecutive days immediately before the first week of the benefit year or, in the case of a dependent husband, wife, spouse or child, for the duration of the marital or parental relationship if the relationship existed less than 90 days before the beginning of the benefit year, has received more than 1/2 the cost of his or her the spouse's or child's support from the individual claiming the benefits: (a) A child, including stepchild, adopted child, or grandchild of the individual who is under 18 years of age, or 18 years of age and over if, because of physical or mental infirmity, the child is unable to engage in a gainful occupation, or is a full-time student as defined by the particular educational institution, at a high school, vocational school, community or junior college, or college or university and has not attained the age of 22. (b) The husband or wife spouse of the individual. (c) The legal father or mother parent of the individual if that parent is either more than 65 years of age or is permanently disabled from engaging in a gainful occupation. (d) A brother or sister sibling of the individual if the brother or sister sibling is orphaned or the living parents are dependent parents of an individual, and the brother or sister sibling is under 18 years of age, or 18 years of age and over if, because of physical or mental infirmity, the brother or sister sibling is unable to engage in a gainful occupation, or is a full-time student as defined by the particular educational institution, at a high school, vocational school, community or junior college, or college or university and is less than 22 years of age. (5) The number of dependents established for an individual at the beginning of the benefit year remains in effect during the entire benefit year. (6) Dependency status of a dependent, child or otherwise, once established or fixed in favor of an individual is not transferable to or usable by another individual with respect to the same week. Failure on the part of an individual, because of misinformation or lack of information, to furnish all information material for determination of the number of the individual's dependents is good cause to issue a redetermination as to the amount of benefits based on the number of the individual's dependents as of the beginning of the benefit year. (c) Subject to subsection (f), all of the following apply to eligible individuals: (1) Each eligible individual must be paid a weekly benefit rate for a week that the individual earns or receives no remuneration. Notwithstanding the definition of week in section 50, if within 2 consecutive weeks in which an individual was not unemployed within the meaning of section 48 there was a period of 7 or more consecutive days for which the individual did not earn or receive remuneration, that period is considered a week for benefit purposes under this act if a claim for benefits for that period is filed not later than 30 days after the end of the period. (2) An Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (3), an eligible individual's weekly benefit rate is reduced at the rate of 50 cents for each whole $1.00 of remuneration in which the eligible individual earns or receives remuneration in that benefit week. The weekly benefit rate is not reduced under this subdivision for remuneration received for on-call or training services as a volunteer firefighter, if the volunteer firefighter receives less than $10,000.00 in a calendar year for services as a volunteer firefighter. (3) The total benefits and earnings for an individual who receives or earns partial remuneration may not exceed 1-1/2 times his or her the individual's weekly benefit amount. The individual's benefits are reduced by $1.00 for each dollar by which the total benefits and earnings exceed 1-1/2 times the individual's weekly benefit amount. Beginning January 1, 2026, all of the following apply: (a) The total benefits and earnings for an individual who receives or earns partial remuneration may not exceed 2-1/2 times the individual's weekly benefit amount. (b) An individual who receives or earns partial remuneration may earn up to 1/2 of the individual's weekly benefit amount without a reduction to the individual's benefits. (c) An individual's benefits are reduced by 50 cents for each dollar by which the remuneration received or earned by the individual exceeds 1/2 of the individual's weekly benefit amount. (4) If the reduction in a claimant's benefit rate for a week in accordance with subdivision (2) or (3) results in a benefit rate greater than zero for that week, the claimant's balance of weeks of benefit payments is reduced by 1 week. (5) All remuneration for work performed during a shift that terminates on 1 day but that began on the preceding day is considered to have been earned by the eligible individual on the preceding day. (6) The unemployment insurance agency shall report annually to the legislature the following information with regard to subdivisions (2) and (3): (a) The number of individuals whose weekly benefit rate was reduced at the rate of 50 cents for each whole $1.00 of remuneration earned or received over the immediately preceding calendar year. (b) The number of individuals who received or earned partial remuneration at or exceeding the applicable limit of 1-1/2 times their the individuals' weekly benefit amount prescribed in subdivision (3) for any 1 or more weeks during the immediately preceding calendar year. (7) The unemployment insurance agency shall not use prorated quarterly wages to establish a reduction in benefits under this subsection. (d) Subject to subsection (f) and this subsection, the maximum benefit amount payable to an individual in a benefit year for purposes of this section and section 20(d) is the number of weeks of benefits payable to an individual during the benefit year, multiplied by the individual's weekly benefit rate. The number of weeks of benefits payable to an individual is calculated by taking 43% of the individual's base period wages and dividing the result by the individual's weekly benefit rate. If the quotient is not a whole or half number, the result is rounded down to the nearest half number. For each eligible individual filing an initial claim on or after January 15, 2012, not more than 20 weeks of benefits or less than 14 weeks of benefits are payable to an individual in a benefit year. For each eligible individual filing an initial claim on or after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this sentence, April 2, 2025, not more than 26 weeks of benefits or less than 14 weeks of benefits are payable to an individual in a benefit year. The limitation of total benefits set forth in this subsection does not apply to claimants declared eligible for training benefits in accordance with subsection (g). Notwithstanding any other provision of this act, and subject to subsection (q), with respect to benefit years and claims for weeks beginning before April 1, 2021, for each eligible individual who files a claim for benefits and establishes a benefit year, not more than 26 weeks of benefits or less than 14 weeks of benefits may be payable to an individual in a benefit year. (e) When If a claimant dies or is judicially declared insane or mentally incompetent, unemployment compensation benefits accrued and payable to that claimant for weeks of unemployment before death, insanity, or incompetency, but not paid, become due and payable to the person who that is the legal heir or guardian of the claimant or to any other person found by the unemployment insurance agency to be equitably entitled to the benefits by reason of having incurred expense in behalf of the claimant for the claimant's burial or other necessary expenses. (f)(1) For benefit years beginning before October 1, 2000, and notwithstanding any inconsistent provisions of this act, the weekly benefit rate of each individual who is receiving or will receive a "retirement benefit", as defined in subdivision (4), retirement benefit is adjusted as provided in subparagraphs (a), (b), and (c). However, an individual's extended benefit account and an individual's weekly extended benefit rate under section 64 is established without reduction under this subsection unless subdivision (5) is in effect. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, all other provisions of this act continue to apply in connection with the benefit claims of those retired individuals. (a) If and to the extent that unemployment benefits payable under this act would be chargeable to an employer who that has contributed to the financing of a retirement plan under which the claimant is receiving or will receive a retirement benefit yielding a pro rata weekly amount equal to or larger than the claimant's weekly benefit rate as otherwise established under this act, the claimant must not receive unemployment benefits that would be chargeable to the employer under this act. (b) If and to the extent that unemployment benefits payable under this act would be chargeable to an employer who that has contributed to the financing of a retirement plan under which the claimant is receiving or will receive a retirement benefit yielding a pro rata weekly amount less than the claimant's weekly benefit rate as otherwise established under this act, then the weekly benefit rate otherwise payable to the claimant and chargeable to the employer under this act is reduced by an amount equal to the pro rata weekly amount, adjusted to the next lower multiple of $1.00, which the claimant is receiving or will receive as a retirement benefit. (c) If the unemployment benefit payable under this act would be chargeable to an employer who that has not contributed to the financing of a retirement plan under which the claimant is receiving or will receive a retirement benefit, then the weekly benefit rate of the claimant as otherwise established under this act is not reduced because the claimant is receiving or will receive a retirement benefit. (d) If the unemployment benefit payable under this act is computed on the basis of multiemployer credit weeks and a portion of the benefit is allocable under section 20(e) to an employer who that has contributed to the financing of a retirement plan under which the claimant is receiving or will receive a retirement benefit, the adjustments required by subparagraph (a) or (b) apply only to that portion of the weekly benefit rate that would otherwise be allocable and chargeable to the employer. (2) If an individual's weekly benefit rate under this act was established before the period for which the individual first receives a retirement benefit, any benefits received after a retirement benefit becomes payable must be determined in accordance with the formula stated in this subsection. (3) When necessary to assure ensure prompt payment of benefits, the unemployment insurance agency shall determine the pro rata weekly amount yielded by an individual's retirement benefit based on the best information currently available to it. In the absence of fraud, a determination must not be reconsidered unless it is established that the individual's actual retirement benefit in fact differs from the amount determined by $2.00 or more per week. The reconsideration applies only to benefits that may be claimed after the information on which the reconsideration is based was received by the unemployment insurance agency. (4)(a) As used in this subsection, "retirement benefit" means a benefit, annuity, or pension of any type, or a part thereof as described in subparagraph (b), that is both of the following: (i) Provided as an incident of employment under an established retirement plan, policy, or agreement, including federal Social Security if subdivision (5) is in effect. (ii) Payable to an individual because the individual has qualified on the basis of attained age, length of service, or disability, whether or not the individual retired or was retired from employment. Amounts paid to individuals in the course of liquidation of a private pension or retirement fund because of termination of the business or of a plant or department of the business of the employer involved are not retirement benefits. (b) If a benefit as described in subparagraph (a) is payable or paid to an individual under a plan to which the individual has contributed, the benefit is treated as follows: (i) If the individual has contributed less than 1/2 of the cost of the benefit, then only 1/2 of the benefit is treated as a retirement benefit. (ii) If the individual has contributed 1/2 or more of the cost of the benefit, then none of the benefit is treated as a retirement benefit. (c) The burden of establishing the extent of an individual's contribution to the cost of his or her the individual's retirement benefit for the purpose of subparagraph (b) is upon the employer who that has contributed to the plan under which a benefit is provided. (5) Notwithstanding any other provision of this subsection, for any week that an individual is receiving a governmental or other pension and claiming unemployment compensation, the weekly benefit amount payable to the individual for those weeks is reduced, but not below zero, by the entire prorated weekly amount of any governmental or other pension, retirement or retired pay, annuity, or any other similar payment that is based on any previous work of the individual. This reduction is made only if it is required as a condition for full tax credit against the tax imposed by the federal unemployment tax act, 26 USC 3301 to 3311. (6) For benefit years beginning on or after October 1, 2000, notwithstanding any inconsistent provisions of this act, the weekly benefit rate of each individual who is receiving or will receive a retirement benefit, as defined in subdivision (4), is adjusted as provided in subparagraphs (a), (b), and (c). However, an individual's extended benefit account and an individual's weekly extended benefit rate under section 64 is established without reduction under this subsection, unless subdivision (5) is in effect. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, all the other provisions of this act apply to the benefit claims of those retired individuals. However, if the reduction would impair the full tax credit against the tax imposed by the federal unemployment tax act, 26 USC 3301 to 3311, unemployment benefits are not reduced as provided in subparagraphs (a), (b), and (c) for receipt of any governmental or other pension, retirement or retired pay, annuity, or other similar payment that was not includable in the gross income of the individual for the taxable year in which it was received because it was a part of a rollover distribution. (a) If any base period employer or chargeable employer has contributed to the financing of a retirement plan under which the claimant is receiving or will receive a retirement benefit yielding a pro rata weekly amount equal to or larger than the claimant's weekly benefit rate as otherwise established under this act, the claimant is not eligible to receive unemployment benefits. (b) If any base period employer or chargeable employer has contributed to the financing of a retirement plan under which the claimant is receiving or will receive a retirement benefit yielding a pro rata weekly amount less than the claimant's weekly benefit rate as otherwise established under this act, then the weekly benefit rate otherwise payable to the claimant is reduced by an amount equal to the pro rata weekly amount, adjusted to the next lower multiple of $1.00, that the claimant is receiving or will receive as a retirement benefit. (c) If no base period employer or separating employer has contributed to the financing of a retirement plan under which the claimant is receiving or will receive a retirement benefit, then the weekly benefit rate of the claimant as otherwise established under this act is not reduced because the claimant is receiving or will receive a retirement benefit. (g) Notwithstanding any other provision of this act, an individual pursuing vocational training or retraining pursuant to section 28(2) who has exhausted all benefits available under subsection (d) may be paid for each week of approved vocational training pursued beyond the date of exhaustion of a benefit amount in accordance with subsection (c), but not in excess of the individual's most recent weekly benefit rate. However, an individual must not be paid training benefits totaling more than 18 times the individual's most recent weekly benefit rate. The expiration or termination of a benefit year does not stop or interrupt payment of training benefits if the training for which the benefits were granted began before expiration or termination of the benefit year. (h) A payment of accrued unemployment benefits is not payable to an eligible individual or in behalf of that individual as provided in subsection (e) more than 6 years after the ending date of the benefit year covering the payment or 2 calendar years after the calendar year in which there is final disposition of a contested case, whichever is later. (i) Benefits based on service in employment described in section 42(8), (9), and (10) are payable in the same amount, on the same terms, and subject to the same conditions as compensation payable on the basis of other service subject to this act, except that all of the following apply: (1) For service performed in an instructional, research, or principal administrative capacity for an institution of higher education as defined in section 53(2), or for an educational institution other than an institution of higher education as defined in section 53(3), benefits are not payable to an individual based on those services for any week of unemployment that commences during the period between 2 successive academic years or during a similar period between 2 regular terms, whether or not successive, or during a period of paid sabbatical leave provided for in the individual's contract, to an individual if the individual performs the service in the first of the academic years or terms and if there is a contract or a reasonable assurance that the individual will perform service in an instructional, research, or principal administrative capacity for an institution of higher education or an educational institution other than an institution of higher education in the second of the academic years or terms, whether or not the terms are successive. (2) For service performed in other than an instructional, research, or principal administrative capacity for an institution of higher education as defined in section 53(2) or for an educational institution other than an institution of higher education as defined in section 53(3), benefits are not payable based on those services for any week of unemployment that commences during the period between 2 successive academic years or terms to any individual if that individual performs the service in the first of the academic years or terms and if there is a reasonable assurance that the individual will perform the service for an institution of higher education or an educational institution other than an institution of higher education in the second of the academic years or terms. (3) For any service described in subdivision (1) or (2), benefits are not payable to an individual based on service for any week of unemployment that commences during an established and customary vacation period or holiday recess if the individual performs the service in the period immediately before the vacation period or holiday recess and there is a contract or reasonable assurance that the individual will perform the service in the period immediately following the vacation period or holiday recess. (4) If benefits are denied to an individual for any week solely as a result of subdivision (2) and the individual was not offered an opportunity to perform in the second academic year or term the service for which reasonable assurance had been given, the individual is entitled to a retroactive payment of benefits for each week for which the individual had previously filed a timely claim for benefits. An individual entitled to benefits under this subdivision may apply for those benefits by mail in accordance with R 421.210 of the Michigan Administrative Code. (5) The unemployment insurance agency shall not deny benefits based on services in other than an instructional, research, or principal administrative capacity for an institution of higher education for any week of unemployment commencing during the period between 2 successive academic years or terms solely because the individual had performed the service in the first of the academic years or terms and there is reasonable assurance that the individual will perform the service for an institution of higher education or an educational institution other than an institution of higher education in the second of the academic years or terms, unless a denial is required as a condition for full tax credit against the tax imposed by the federal unemployment tax act, 26 USC 3301 to 3311. (6) For benefit years established before October 1, 2000, and notwithstanding subdivisions (1), (2), and (3), the denial of benefits does not prevent an individual from completing requalifying weeks in accordance with section 29(3) nor does the denial prevent an individual from receiving benefits based on service with an employer other than an educational institution for any week of unemployment occurring between academic years or terms, whether or not successive, or during an established and customary vacation period or holiday recess, even though the employer is not the most recent chargeable employer in the individual's base period. However, in that case section 20(b) applies to the sequence of benefit charging, except for the employment with the educational institution. When a denial of benefits under subdivision (1) no longer applies, benefits are charged in accordance with the normal sequence of charging as provided in section 20(b). (7) For benefit years beginning on or after October 1, 2000, and notwithstanding subdivisions (1), (2), and (3), the denial of benefits does not prevent an individual from completing requalifying weeks in accordance with section 29(3) and does not prevent an individual from receiving benefits based on service with another base period employer other than an educational institution for any week of unemployment occurring between academic years or terms, whether or not successive, or during an established and customary vacation period or holiday recess. However, if benefits are paid based on service with 1 or more base period employers other than an educational institution, the individual's weekly benefit rate is calculated in accordance with subsection (b)(1) but during the denial period the individual's weekly benefit payment is reduced by the portion of the payment attributable to base period wages paid by an educational institution and the account or experience account of the educational institution is not charged for benefits payable to the individual. When a denial of benefits under subdivision (1) is no longer applicable, benefits are paid and charged on the basis of base period wages with each of the base period employers including the educational institution. (8) For the purposes of this subsection, "academic year" means that period, as defined by the educational institution, when classes are in session for that length of time required for students to receive sufficient instruction or earn sufficient credit to complete academic requirements for a particular grade level or to complete instruction in a noncredit course. (9) In accordance with subdivisions (1), (2), and (3), benefits for any week of unemployment are denied to an individual who performed services described in subdivision (1), (2), or (3) in an educational institution while in the employ of an educational service agency. For the purpose of this subdivision, "educational service agency" means a governmental agency or governmental entity that is established and operated exclusively for the purpose of providing the services to 1 or more educational institutions. (j) Benefits are not payable to an individual on the basis of any base period services, substantially all of which consist of participating in sports or athletic events or training or preparing to participate, for a week that commences during the period between 2 successive sport seasons or similar periods if the individual performed the services in the first of the seasons or similar periods and there is a reasonable assurance that the individual will perform the services in the later of the seasons or similar periods. (k)(1) Benefits are not payable on the basis of services performed by an alien unless the alien is an individual who was lawfully admitted for permanent residence at the time the services were performed, was lawfully present for the purpose of performing the services, or was permanently residing in the United States under color of law at the time the services were performed, including an alien who was lawfully present in the United States under section 212(d)(5) of the immigration and nationality act, 8 USC 1182. (2) Any data or information required of individuals applying for benefits to determine whether benefits are payable because of their alien status are uniformly required from all applicants for benefits. (3) If an individual's application for benefits would otherwise be approved, a determination that benefits to that individual are not payable because of the individual's alien status must be made upon a preponderance of the evidence. (m)(1) An individual filing a new claim for unemployment compensation under this act, at the time of filing the claim, shall disclose whether the individual owes child support obligations as defined in this subsection. If an individual discloses that he or she the individual owes child support obligations and is determined to be eligible for unemployment compensation, the unemployment insurance agency shall notify the state or local child support enforcement agency enforcing the obligation that the individual has been determined to be eligible for unemployment compensation. (2) Notwithstanding section 30, the unemployment insurance agency shall deduct and withhold from any unemployment compensation payable to an individual who owes child support obligations by using whichever of the following methods results in the greatest amount: (a) The amount, if any, specified by the individual to be deducted and withheld under this subdivision. (b) The amount, if any, determined pursuant to an agreement submitted to the unemployment insurance agency under 42 USC 654(19)(B)(i), by the state or local child support enforcement agency. (c) Any amount otherwise required to be deducted and withheld from unemployment compensation by legal process, as that term is defined in 42 USC 659(i)(5), properly served upon the unemployment insurance agency. (3) The amount of unemployment compensation subject to deduction under subdivision (2) is that portion that remains payable to the individual after application of the recovery provisions of section 62(a) and the reduction provisions of subsections (c) and (f). (4) The unemployment insurance agency shall pay any amount deducted and withheld under subdivision (2) to the appropriate state or local child support enforcement agency. (5) Any amount deducted and withheld under subdivision (2) is treated for all purposes as if it were paid to the individual as unemployment compensation and paid by the individual to the state or local child support enforcement agency in satisfaction of the individual's child support obligations. (6) Provisions concerning deductions under this subsection apply only if the state or local child support enforcement agency agrees in writing to reimburse and does reimburse the unemployment insurance agency for the administrative costs incurred by the unemployment insurance agency under this subsection that are attributable to child support obligations being enforced by the state or local child support enforcement agency. The administrative costs incurred are determined by the unemployment insurance agency. The unemployment insurance agency, in its discretion, may require payment of administrative costs in advance. (7) As used in this subsection: (a) "Unemployment compensation", for purposes of subdivisions (1) to (5), means any compensation payable under this act, including amounts payable by the unemployment insurance agency pursuant to an agreement under any federal law providing for compensation, assistance, or allowances with respect to unemployment. (b) "Child support obligations" includes only obligations that are being enforced pursuant to a plan described in 42 USC 654 that has been approved by the Secretary of Health and Human Services under 42 USC 651 to 669b. (c) "State or local child support enforcement agency" means any agency of this state or a political subdivision of this state operating pursuant to a plan described in subparagraph (b). (n) Subsection (i)(2) applies to services performed by school bus drivers employed by a private contributing employer holding a contractual relationship with an educational institution, but only if at least 75% of the individual's base period wages with that employer are attributable to services performed as a school bus driver. Subsection (i)(1) and (2) but not subsection (i)(3) applies to other services described in those subdivisions that are performed by any employees under an employer's contract with an educational institution or an educational service agency. (o)(1) Benefits based on services by a seasonal worker performed in seasonal employment are payable only for weeks of unemployment that occur during the normal seasonal work period. Benefits are not payable based on services performed in seasonal employment for any week of unemployment that begins during the period between 2 successive normal seasonal work periods to any individual if that individual performs the service in the first of the normal seasonal work periods and if there is a reasonable assurance that the individual will perform the service for a seasonal employer in the second of the normal seasonal work periods. If benefits are denied to an individual for any week solely as a result of this subsection and the individual is not offered an opportunity to perform in the second normal seasonal work period for which reasonable assurance of employment had been given, the individual is entitled to a retroactive payment of benefits under this subsection for each week that the individual previously filed a timely claim for benefits. An individual may apply for any retroactive benefits under this subsection in accordance with R 421.210 of the Michigan Administrative Code. (2) Not less than 20 days before the estimated beginning date of a normal seasonal work period, an employer may apply to the unemployment insurance agency in writing for designation as a seasonal employer. At the time of application, the employer shall conspicuously display a copy of the application on the employer's premises. Within 90 days after receipt of the application, the unemployment insurance agency shall determine if the employer is a seasonal employer. A determination or redetermination of the unemployment insurance agency concerning the status of an employer as a seasonal employer, or a decision of an administrative law judge, the Michigan compensation appellate commission, or the courts of this state concerning the status of an employer as a seasonal employer, that has become final, together with the record thereof, may be introduced in any proceeding involving a claim for benefits, and the facts found and decision issued in the determination, redetermination, or decision are conclusive unless substantial evidence to the contrary is introduced by or on behalf of the claimant. (3) If the unemployment insurance agency determines that an employer is a seasonal employer, the employer shall conspicuously display on its premises a notice that includes the determination, the beginning and ending dates of the employer's normal seasonal work periods, and a statement that an employee must timely apply for unemployment benefits at the end of a first seasonal work period to preserve his or her the employee's right to receive retroactive unemployment benefits if he or she the employee is not reemployed by the seasonal employer in the second of the normal seasonal work periods. The unemployment insurance agency shall provide the notice to the employer. (4) The unemployment insurance agency may issue a determination terminating an employer's status as a seasonal employer on the unemployment insurance agency's own motion for good cause, or upon the written request of the employer. A termination determination under this subdivision terminates an employer's status as a seasonal employer, and becomes effective on the beginning date of the normal seasonal work period that would have immediately followed the date the unemployment insurance agency issues the determination. A determination under this subdivision is subject to review in the same manner and to the same extent as any other determination under this act. (5) An employer whose that has its status as a seasonal employer is terminated under subdivision (4) may not reapply for a seasonal employer status determination until after a regularly recurring normal seasonal work period has begun and ended. (6) If a seasonal employer informs an employee who received assurance of being rehired that, despite the assurance, the employee will not be rehired at the beginning of the employer's next normal seasonal work period, this subsection does not prevent the employee from receiving unemployment benefits in the same manner and to the same extent he or she the employee would receive benefits under this act from an employer who that has not been determined to be a seasonal employer. (7) A successor of a seasonal employer is considered to be a seasonal employer unless the successor provides the unemployment insurance agency, within 120 days after the transfer, with a written request for termination of its status as a seasonal employer in accordance with subdivision (4). (8) At the time an employee is hired by a seasonal employer, the employer shall notify the employee in writing if the employee will be a seasonal worker. The employer shall provide the worker with written notice of any subsequent change in the employee's status as a seasonal worker. If an employee of a seasonal employer is denied benefits because that employee is a seasonal worker, the employee may contest that designation in accordance with section 32a. (9) As used in this subsection: (a) "Construction industry" means the work activity designated in sector group 23 - construction of the North American Classification System - United States Office of Management and Budget, 1997 edition. (b) "Normal seasonal work period" means that period or those periods of time determined under rules promulgated by the unemployment insurance agency during which an individual is employed in seasonal employment. (c) "Seasonal employment" means the employment of 1 or more individuals primarily hired to perform services during regularly recurring periods of 26 weeks or less in any 52-week period other than services in the construction industry. (d) "Seasonal employer" means an employer, other than an employer in the construction industry, who that applies to the unemployment insurance agency for designation as a seasonal employer and who that the unemployment insurance agency determines is an employer whose that has operations and business that require employees engaged in seasonal employment. A seasonal employer designation under this act need not correspond to a category assigned under the North American Classification System - United States Office of Management and Budget. (e) "Seasonal worker" means a worker who has been paid wages by a seasonal employer for work performed only during the normal seasonal work period. (10) This subsection does not apply if the United States Department of Labor finds it to be contrary to the federal unemployment tax act, 26 USC 3301 to 3311, or the social security act, chapter 531, 49 Stat 620, and if conformity with the federal law is required as a condition for full tax credit against the tax imposed under the federal unemployment tax act, 26 USC 3301 to 3311, or as a condition for receipt by the unemployment insurance agency of federal administrative grant funds under the social security act, chapter 531, 49 Stat 620. (p) Benefits are not payable to an individual based upon his or her on the individual's services as a school crossing guard for any week of unemployment that begins between 2 successive academic years or terms, if the individual performs the services of a school crossing guard in the first of the academic years or terms and has a reasonable assurance that he or she the individual will perform those services in the second of the academic years or terms. (q) The extension of benefits for claims for weeks beginning after January 1, 2021 but before April 1, 2021 as described in subsection (d) does not take effect unless $220,000,000.00 or more is appropriated as provided for in Senate Bill No. 748 of the 100th Legislature for deposit into the unemployment compensation fund to cover the extension of benefits. After March 1, 2021, from the funds appropriated in Senate Bill No. 748 of the 100th Legislature for Michigan unemployment compensation funds, $220,000,000.00 shall be deposited into the unemployment compensation fund for the sole purpose of funding the extension of benefits for claims for weeks beginning after January 1, 2021 but before April 1, 2021 as described in subsection (d). If federal funds are available and expenditures are allowable under federal law, expenditures of federal funds under this subsection shall occur before the expenditure of state general fund appropriations made for the same purpose described in this subsection. State general fund appropriations replaced by federal expenditures authorized under this subsection shall revert to the general fund. (r) At the end of each calendar year after December 31, 2026, the state treasurer shall adjust the monetary amount for each dependent and the maximum weekly benefit rate in subsection (b)(1) by an amount determined by the state treasurer to reflect the cumulative annual percentage change in the Consumer Price Index. As used in this subsection, "Consumer Price Index" means the most comprehensive index of consumer prices available for this state from the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor.